russian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    +N      ! Noun tag (существительное)
    +Sg     ! Singular (единственное число)
    +Pl     ! Plural (множественное число)
    +Nom    ! Nominative (именительный падеж)
    +Gen    ! Genitive (родительный падеж)
    +Dat    ! Dative (дательный падеж)
    +Acc    ! Accusative (винительный падеж)
    +Ins    ! Instrumental (творительный падеж)
    +Pre    ! Prepositional (предложный падеж)
    
! Define root lexicon

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ; ! No input, no output

! Define noun lexicon
! Russian has 3 noun declensions:
! Declension 1 - masculine or feminine nouns that end in -а or -я
! Declension 2 - masculine nouns that end in a consonant, in a -ь, or in a -й and neuter words that end in -о or -е
! Declension 3 - feminine nouns that end in -ь

! Due to the complex nature of Russian noun declension (each declension has multiple sub-declensions in it, based on the animacy, the last letter of the stem and other factors), this lexicon will not cover all of the possible cases.
! We will consider the following words:
! стена - wall
! зарплата - salary
! буря - storm
! стол - table
! рот - mouth
! адвокат - lawyer
! человек - human
! озеро - lake
! поле - field
! кровать - bed
! тетрадь - notebook
! мать - mother
! шоссе - highway

LEXICON Nouns
    стен N1dekl_a;
    зарплат N1dekl_a;
    бур N1dekl_ya;

    стол N2dekl_cons_ply; ! ply - Plural Nominative has -ы
    рот N2dekl_cons_ply;
    крюк N2dekl_cons_pli; ! pli - Plural Nominative has -и
    адвокат N2dekl_cons_anim_ply; ! animate noun (different ending in accusative)
    человек N2dekl_cons_anim_pli; ! irregular plural forms using a different stem (люди, людей, людям...)
    озер N2dekl_o; ! -е -> -ё change in plural (озёра, озёр...)
    пол N2dekl_e;

    кроват N3dekl;
    тетрад N3dekl;
    мат N3dekl_anim; ! irregular forms, suffix -ер is inserted (матери, матерью, матерей...)

    шоссе N0dekl; ! indeclinable word

! Define the noun declension paradigms

LEXICON N1dekl_a
    +N+Sg+Nom:^а # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^ы # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^е # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^у # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^ой # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^е # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^ы # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^ # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^ам # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^ы # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^ами # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^ах # ;

LEXICON N1dekl_ya
    +N+Sg+Nom:^я # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^и # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^е # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^ю # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^ей # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^е # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^и  # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^ь  # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^ям # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^и # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^ями # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^ях # ;

LEXICON N2dekl_cons_ply
    +N+Sg+Nom:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^Dа # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^Dу # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^Dом # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^Dе # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^Dы # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^Dов # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^Dам # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^Dы # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^Dами # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^Dах # ;

LEXICON N2dekl_cons_pli
    +N+Sg+Nom:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^а # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^у # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^ом # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^е # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^и # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^ов # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^ам # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^и # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^ами # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^ах # ;

LEXICON N2dekl_cons_anim_ply
    +N+Sg+Nom:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^а # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^у # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^а # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^ом # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^е # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^ы # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^ов # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^ам # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^ов # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^ами # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^ах # ;

LEXICON N2dekl_cons_anim_pli
    +N+Sg+Nom:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^а # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^у # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^а # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^ом # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^е # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^и # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^ов # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^ам # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^ов # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^ами # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^ах # ;

LEXICON N2dekl_o
    +N+Sg+Nom:^о  # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^а # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^у # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^о # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^ом # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^е # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^Sа # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^S # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^Sам # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^Sа # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^Sами # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^Sах # ;

LEXICON N2dekl_e
    +N+Sg+Nom:^е # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^я # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^ю # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^е # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^ем # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^е # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^я # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^ей # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^ям # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^я # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^ями # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^ях # ;

LEXICON N3dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom:^ь  # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^Iи # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^Iи # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^ь # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^Iью # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^Iи # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^Iи  # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^Iей  # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^Iям # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^Iи # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^Iями # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^Iях # ;

LEXICON N3dekl_anim
    +N+Sg+Nom:^ь  # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^Iи # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^Iи # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^ь # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^Iью # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^Iи # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^Iи  # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^Iей  # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^Iям # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^Iей # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^Iями # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^Iях # ;

LEXICON N0dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Ins:^ # ;
    +N+Sg+Pre:^ # ;

    +N+Pl+Nom:^ # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen:^ # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat:^ # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc:^ # ;
    +N+Pl+Ins:^ # ;
    +N+Pl+Pre:^ # ;
